Nebraska, session 109, LB263.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. APPROPRIATION LANGUAGE.
There are hereby appropriated, for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27, the amounts
specified in this act, or so much as may be necessary, for the salaries and
benefits of officers of the Nebraska state government.
Sec. 2. DEFINITION OF APPROPRIATION PERIOD.
For purposes of this act, FY2025-26 means the period beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2026, and FY2026-27 means the period beginning July
1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.
Sec. 3. NEBRASKA ACCOUNTING SYSTEM MANUAL DEFINITIONS.
The definitions contained in the Nebraska Accounting System Manual, and
any amendments thereto, on file with the Clerk of the Legislature are hereby
adopted by the Legislature as the definitions for this act, except as provided
in section 5 of this act.
Sec. 4. DRAWING AND PAYING WARRANTS.
The Director of Administrative Services shall draw warrants upon the
proper fund in the state treasury for an amount not to exceed the
appropriations set forth in this act upon presentation of proper documentation.
The State Treasurer shall pay the warrants out of the appropriate funds.
Workers' compensation premium assessments shall not be paid from the
programs listed in this act.
Sec. 5. LIMITATION ON SALARIES, WAGES, AND PER DIEMS.
(1) As used in this act:
(a) SALARY LIMIT means total expenditures for permanent and temporary
salaries and per diems; and
(b) Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
means all remuneration paid to employees treated as taxable compensation by the
Internal Revenue Service or subject to social security coverage, specifically
including payments accounted for as vacation, holidays, sick leave, military
leave, funeral leave, maternity leave, administrative leave, compensatory time,
deferred compensation, or any other similar form, and amounts withheld pursuant
to law, but excluding state contributions for social security, retirement, and
employee insurance plans.
(2) Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
are limited to the amount provided by law for constitutional officers.
(3) The limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries
and per diems for FY2025-26 shall be increased by certified encumbrance amounts
from FY2024-25 for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems. The
limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for FY2026-27 shall be increased by certified encumbrance amounts from
FY2025-26 for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems. Encumbered
amounts shall be calculated in accordance with section 81-138.01.
Sec. 6. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 3 - Supreme Court Judges' Salaries
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,885,504 1,908,959
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,885,504 1,908,959
SALARY LIMIT 1,575,388 1,575,388
Sec. 7. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 4 - Court of Appeals Judges' Salaries
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,556,026 1,577,052
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,556,026 1,577,052
SALARY LIMIT 1,282,817 1,282,817
Sec. 8. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 5 - Retired Judges' Salaries
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
-1-

LB263 LB263
2025 2025
GENERAL FUND 72,436 72,436
PROGRAM TOTAL 72,436 72,436
SALARY LIMIT 69,832 69,832
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2026, is hereby reappropriated.
The budget division of the Department of Administrative Services shall
administratively transfer General Fund appropriations or Salary Limits or both
among Programs 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 within Agency 5, upon written certification by
the State Court Administrator that the Nebraska Supreme Court has determined
that such transfer is necessary for the efficient functioning of statewide
court operations and the proper administration of justice.
Sec. 9. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 6 - District and Juvenile Court Judges' Salaries
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 17,331,218 17,533,770
PROGRAM TOTAL 17,331,218 17,533,770
SALARY LIMIT 14,569,523 14,569,523
Sec. 10. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 7 - County Court Judges' Salaries
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 14,278,652 14,448,176
PROGRAM TOTAL 14,278,652 14,448,176
SALARY LIMIT 11,950,447 11,950,447
Sec. 11. AGENCY NO. 7 — GOVERNOR
Program No. 2 - Salary - Governor
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 151,900 151,900
PROGRAM TOTAL 151,900 151,900
SALARY LIMIT 105,000 105,000
Sec. 12. AGENCY NO. 8 — LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
Program No. 8 - Salary - Lieutenant Governor
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 120,009 120,009
PROGRAM TOTAL 120,009 120,009
SALARY LIMIT 75,000 75,000
Sec. 13. AGENCY NO. 9 — SECRETARY OF STATE
Program No. 9 - Salary - Secretary of State
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 126,404 129,542
PROGRAM TOTAL 126,404 129,542
SALARY LIMIT 85,000 85,000
Sec. 14. AGENCY NO. 10 — AUDITOR OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS
Program No. 10 - Salary - Auditor of Public Accounts
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 132,614 136,399
PROGRAM TOTAL 132,614 136,399
SALARY LIMIT 85,000 85,000
Sec. 15. AGENCY NO. 11 — ATTORNEY GENERAL
Program No. 11 - Attorney General's Salary
-2-

LB263 LB263
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 142,367 142,367
PROGRAM TOTAL 142,367 142,367
SALARY LIMIT 95,000 95,000
Sec. 16. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 12 - Salary - State Treasurer
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 50,576 52,200
CASH FUND 87,035 89,843
PROGRAM TOTAL 137,611 142,043
SALARY LIMIT 85,000 85,000
Sec. 17. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 14 - Salaries of Public Service Commissioners
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 506,453 506,453
PROGRAM TOTAL 506,453 506,453
SALARY LIMIT 375,000 375,000
Sec. 18. AGENCY NO. 15 — BOARD OF PARDONS AND BOARD OF PAROLE
Program No. 320 - Board of Parole Salaries
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 745,039 777,249
PROGRAM TOTAL 745,039 777,249
SALARY LIMIT 550,121 567,437
Sec. 19. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 13 - Salary - Tax Commissioner
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 211,572 219,088
CASH FUND 64,212 66,436
PROGRAM TOTAL 275,784 285,524
SALARY LIMIT 212,972 219,613
It is the intent of the Legislature that if the appropriation or the
salary limit is insufficient in this program to meet anticipated expenditures,
the Tax Commissioner shall request an additional appropriation or a higher
salary limit, or both, from the Legislature by the usual deficit process. The
appropriation or the salary limit shall not be administratively increased
solely by the Department of Administrative Services without legislative
authorization.
Sec. 20. AGENCY NO. 37 — NEBRASKA WORKERS' COMPENSATION COURT
Program No. 526 - Judges' Salaries
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,488,346 1,488,346
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,488,346 1,488,346
SALARY LIMIT 1,249,057 1,249,057
Sec. 21. AGENCY NO. 37 — NEBRASKA WORKERS' COMPENSATION COURT
Program No. 635 - Retired and Acting Judges' Salaries
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 55,267 55,267
PROGRAM TOTAL 55,267 55,267
-3-

LB263 LB263
2025 2025
SALARY LIMIT 51,339 51,339
Sec. 22. AGENCY NO. 93 — TAX EQUALIZATION AND REVIEW COMMISSION
Program No. 131 - Commissioners' Salaries
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 856,970 862,867
PROGRAM TOTAL 856,970 862,867
SALARY LIMIT 697,672 697,672
Sec. 23. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 24. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-4-